Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.24.010

Airport operation, planning and zoning.

A code city may exercise the powers relating to airport planning and zoning, improvement and operation as authorized by chapters 14.07, 14.08, and 14.12 RCW and chapter 35A.63 RCW of this title in accordance with the procedures therein prescribed.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.24.010.]